Utah statutes.
12-1-5.   Record of registrations and bonds -- Right of inspection.
The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall keep a record of all
registrations and bonds filed with it under the provisions hereof, with the
names, places of residence, and places of business of the principals and
sureties, and the name of the officer before whom the bond was executed or
acknowledged, and the record shall be open to public inspection.
